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DTC C 1224 / 44 NE Signal Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU receives engine revolution speed signals (NE signals) from the engine
and ECT ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1224 /44

When any of the following 1. through 2. is detected:
1. At vehicle speed of 30 km/h (19 mph) or more, and

when data received from the engine and ECT ECU is in
normalcondition,andopenorshort circuit forengine
revolutionsignalcircuit continues for10sec.ormore.

2.WhileTRCisoperating, theconditions thatopenorshort
circuit in engine revolution signal circuit is detected,
main throttle opening degree is 0 and IDL switch is OFF
continue for 0.24 sec. or more.

SNEOcircuit
SEngineandECTECU
SABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the NE signal circuit, the ECU prohibits TRC & VSC controls.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between terminal
NEO of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and terminal NEO of engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK

2 Check voltage between terminal NEO of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminal NEO of ABS & BA &

TRC & VSC ECU and body ground for the engine condi-
tions below.

OK:

Engine condition Voltage

OFF (IG ON) 3 − 6Vorbelow1V

ON (Idling) 3 − 6 V � below1V(Pulse)

NG Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU
or engine and ECT ECU.



−DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI−53

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)

OK

If the same codes is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection.


